Utah statutes.
9-8-201.   Division of State History -- Creation -- Purpose.

(1)  There is created within the department the Division of State History under the administration and general supervision of the executive director or the designee of the executive director.

(2)  The division shall be under the policy direction of the board.

(3)  The division shall be the authority of the state for state history and shall perform those duties set forth in statute.

